Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1717
Official, defined.

Official shall mean a member of the board of directors of a credit union, an officer of a credit union, a member of the credit committee of a credit union, if any, or a member of the supervisory committee of a credit union.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 17.